test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sibahama65_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sibahama: # Verb (65) sibahama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     sibahama+V+Inf/mA: sibahama
     sibahama+V+Inf: sibadaq
     sibahama+V+Act+PrfPrc: sibanuq
     sibahama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: sibat
     sibahama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sibaha
     sibahama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sibahas
     sibahama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sibasi
     sibahama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sibasi
